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DTC B 1628/29 RSCA Off Switch Indicator Malfunction

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
The RSCA switch is a mechanism that operates both right and left side of the curtain shield airbag assembly
and theseatbeltpretensionerwhen theairbagsensorassemblydetectsa roll −over.
The RSCA off switch indicator light is installed in the combination meter.
Asoperating theRSCAoff switch, the indicator lightcomeson to informthedriver that the roll −overdetection
system is not working.
The initial settingof the roll −overdetectionsystemison. It automaticallyoperatesevery time the ignition
switch is turned on.
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HINT:
DTCB 1628/29 is indicatedonly for thevehicleequippedwith thesideairbag.
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE
The RSCA off indicator light remains on when the RSCA off switch is not op-
erating (Remains ON).

1 Does indicator light turn off?

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the combination meter connector.
CHECK:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to ON.
(b) Check operation of RSCA off indicator light.
OK:

The indicator light does not light up.

NO Check combination meter (See page BE−33).

YES

2 Check wire harness.

PREPARATION:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to LOCK.
(b)Disconnect thenegative ( −) terminal cable fromthebat-

tery, and wait at least for 90 seconds.
(c) Disconnect the airbag sensor assembly connector.
CHECK:
Measure the resistance between the body ground and RMSW
ontheairbagsensorassemblysidebetween thecombination
meterandairbagsensorassembly.
OK:

Resistance: 1 M� orHigher

NG Repair or replace wire harness.

OK
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3 Check airbag sensor assembly.

PREPARATION:
(a) Connect the airbag sensor assembly connector.
(b) Connect the combination meter connector.
(c) Connect the negative (−) terminal cable to the battery,

and wait at least for 2 seconds.
CHECK:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-

conds.
(b) Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI−432).
(c) Turn the ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 10

seconds.
(d) Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-

conds.
(e) Check the DTC (See page DI−432).
OK:

DTC B2628/29 is not output.
HINT:
Codesother thancodeB 1628/29maybeoutputat this time,but
theyarenot relevant to thischeck.

NG Replace airbag sensor assembly.

OK

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning part can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check.
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The RSCA off indicator light does not come on when the RSCA off switch is
operating (Remains OFF).

1 Check voltage of combination meter.

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the combination meter connector.
CHECK:
Measure the voltage of the combination meter.
OK:

Voltage: 10 − 14 V

NG Check combination meter (See page BE−33).

OK

2 Check wire harness.

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the combination meter connector.
CHECK:
Measure the voltage between the body ground and RMSW on the combination meter side between the air-
bag sensor assembly and the combination meter.
OK:

Voltage: Below 1 V

NG Repair or replace wire harness.

OK
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3 Check wire harness.

PREPARATION:
(a) Disconnect the negative (−) terminal cable from the bat-

tery, and wait at least for 90 seconds.
(b) Connect the combination meter connector.
(c) Turn the ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 90

seconds.
(d) Disconnect the airbag sensor assembly connector.
(e) Connect the negative (−) terminal cable to the battery,

and wait at least for 2 seconds.
CHECK:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to ON.
(b) Measure the voltage between the body ground and IG2

on the airbag sensor assembly side.
OK:

Voltage: 10 − 14 V

NG Repair or replace wire harness.

OK
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4 Check airbag sensor assembly.

PREPARATION:
Connect the airbag sensor assembly connector.
CHECK:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-

conds.
(b) Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI−432).
(c) Turn the ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 10

seconds.
(d) Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-

conds.
(e) Check the DTC (See page DI−432).
OK:

DTC B1628/29 is not output.
HINT:
Codes other than code B1628/29 may be output at this time, but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG Replace airbag sensor assembly.

OK

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning part can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check.


